Wyoming, session 2025, SF0176.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 27-3-503(b), (d) and (f) and
27-3-505(d) are amended to read:

27-3-503. Payment; base rate; maximum contribution;
failure to pay; rate variations; benefit ratio; new
employer rate; special reserve rate.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law and subject
to the maximum amount specified in this subsection, the
SF0176

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0705
base rate of contributions assigned to any employer is
eight and one-half percent (8.5%) for 1988 and each
calendar year thereafter subject to rate variations under
subsections (d) and (f) of this section in addition to the
adjustment factors computed under W.S. 27-3-505.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no employer
shall be required to contribute an amount that, when the
base rate is combined with rate variations or adjustment
factors, exceeds one dollar ($1.00) per employee in a
calendar year. Except as hereafter provided and subject to
the maximum amount specified in this subsection, a
contributing employer failing to pay all contributions,
interest and penalties or to submit all quarterly
contribution reports due on his account or any account
assumed under W.S. 27-3-507 on or before September 30
preceding the effective date of his assigned rate shall be
assigned a delinquent rate which shall include a two
percent (2%) tax rate increase in his base rate and shall
also include in addition thereto the adjustment factors for
the next calendar year beginning January 1. The delinquent
rate shall not exceed the maximum assignable rate. The
delinquent rate shall continue to be assigned through and
including the calendar quarter in which the delinquent
SF0176

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0705
employer satisfies his delinquent account by paying all
contributions, interest and penalties due and submitting
all contribution reports due. Upon satisfaction of the
delinquent account, the contributing employer shall be
assigned the contribution rate otherwise applicable under
this article beginning the next full calendar quarter.
Provided however, that a delinquent employer shall pay an
assigned delinquent rate for at least the first quarter
even if the account is satisfied before January 1 of the
new calendar year.

(d) Rate variations from the base rate of
contributions based upon the employer's benefit ratio shall
be assigned to eligible employers each calendar year,
provided that the total contribution required of an
employer in any calendar year shall not exceed the maximum
amount per employee specified in subsection (a) of this
section.

(f) Any new employer not previously subject to this
act or having no established experience period shall pay
contributions at a rate equal to the average rate of
contributions paid by his major industrial classification
SF0176

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0705
for the calendar year preceding the year in which he first
employed workers in this state in addition to the
adjustment factors computed under W.S. 27-3-505. In no
case, however, will any new employer be assigned a rate of
less than one percent (1%), plus the adjustment factors
computed under W.S. 27-3-505,. This nor shall the total
contribution required of a new employer in any calendar
year exceed the maximum amount per employee specified in
subsection (a) of this section. The rate shall be adjusted
annually and the rate shall remain in effect until the
employer has established an experience period in accordance
with this article. The commission shall by rule and
regulation develop the major industrial classifications for
the state and the department shall annually determine the
contribution rate for each classification based upon
contributions paid during the preceding calendar year.

27-3-505. Adjustment for noncharged and ineffectively
charged benefits; adjustment for positive and negative fund
balance; computations; exception; maximum rate.

(d) The adjustment factors computed pursuant to this
section are separate from an employer's experience rating,
SF0176

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0705
shall be algebraically added to the employer's contribution
rate and payable by each employer subject to this article,
provided that the total contribution required of an
employer in any calendar year shall not exceed the maximum
amount per employee specified in W.S. 27-3-503(a). The
adjustment factor computed under subsection (c) of this
section shall be algebraically added only to the
contribution rate of those employers eligible for an
experience rating. The adjustment factors applied to an
employer's contribution rate shall not be less than zero
(0).

Section 2. This act is effective January 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0176